Missouri, session 2026, SB1453.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 191.1146 and 334.108, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 191.1146 and 334.108, to read as follows:
191.1146. 1. Physicians licensed under chapter 334
who use telemedicine shall ensure that a properly
established physician-patient relationship exists with the
person who receives the telemedicine services. The
physician-patient relationship may be established by:
(1) An in-person encounter through a medical
[interview] evaluation and physical examination;
(2) Consultation with another physician, or that
physician's delegate, who has an established relationship
with the patient and an agreement with the physician to
participate in the patient's care; or
(3) A telemedicine encounter, if the standard of care
does not require an in-person encounter, and in accordance
with evidence-based standards of practice and telemedicine
practice guidelines that address the clinical and
technological aspects of telemedicine.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1453 2
2. In order to establish a physician-patient
relationship through telemedicine:
(1) The technology utilized shall be sufficient to
establish an informed diagnosis as though the medical
[interview] evaluation and, if required to meet the standard
of care, the physical examination has been performed in
person; [and]
(2) Prior to providing treatment, including issuing
prescriptions or physician certifications under Article XIV
of the Missouri Constitution, a physician who uses
telemedicine shall [interview] evaluate the patient, collect
or review the patient's relevant medical history, and
perform an examination sufficient for the diagnosis and
treatment of the patient. [A] Any questionnaire completed
by the patient, whether via the internet or telephone, shall
be reviewed by the treating health care professional, as
defined in section 376.1350, and shall include such
information sufficient to provide the information as though
the medical evaluation has been performed in person,
otherwise such questionnaire does not constitute an
acceptable medical [interview] evaluation and examination
for the provision of treatment by telehealth; and
(3) Any provider that uses a questionnaire to
establish a physician-patient relationship through
telemedicine shall be employed or contracted with a business
entity that is licensed to provide health care in this state.
3. A health care provider, utilizing a medical
evaluation questionnaire completed by the patient by way of
the internet or telephone, shall provide a written report to
the patient's primary health care provider within fourteen
days of evaluation, if provided by the patient, that
contains:

SB 1453 3
(1) The identity of the patient;
(2) The date of the evaluation;
(3) The diagnosis and treatment provided, if any; and
(4) Any further instructions provided to the patient.
334.108. 1. Prior to prescribing any drug, controlled
substance, or other treatment through telemedicine, as
defined in section 191.1145, or the internet, a physician
shall establish a valid physician-patient relationship as
described in section 191.1146. This relationship shall
include:
(1) Obtaining a reliable medical history and, if
required to meet the standard of care, performing a physical
examination of the patient, adequate to establish the
diagnosis for which the drug is being prescribed and to
identify underlying conditions or contraindications to the
treatment recommended or provided;
(2) Having a sufficient [dialogue] exchange with the
patient regarding treatment options and the risks and
benefits of treatment or treatments;
(3) If appropriate, following up with the patient to
assess the therapeutic outcome;
(4) Maintaining a contemporaneous medical record that
is readily available to the patient and, subject to the
patient's consent, to the patient's other health care
professionals; and
(5) Maintaining the electronic prescription
information as part of the patient's medical record.
2. The requirements of subsection 1 of this section
may be satisfied by the prescribing physician's designee
when treatment is provided in:
(1) A hospital as defined in section 197.020;
(2) A hospice program as defined in section 197.250;

SB 1453 4
(3) Home health services provided by a home health
agency as defined in section 197.400;
(4) Accordance with a collaborative practice agreement
as [defined] described in section 334.104;
(5) Conjunction with a physician assistant licensed
pursuant to section 334.738;
(6) Conjunction with an assistant physician licensed
under section 334.036;
(7) Consultation with another physician who has an
ongoing physician-patient relationship with the patient, and
who has agreed to supervise the patient's treatment,
including use of any prescribed medications; or
(8) On-call or cross-coverage situations.
3. No health care provider, as defined in section
376.1350, shall prescribe any drug, controlled substance, or
other treatment to a patient based solely on an evaluation
[over the telephone] through telemedicine; except that, a
physician or such physician's on-call designee, or an
advanced practice registered nurse, a physician assistant,
or an assistant physician in a collaborative practice
arrangement with such physician, may prescribe any drug,
controlled substance, or other treatment that is within his
or her scope of practice to a patient based solely on a
[telephone] telemedicine evaluation if a previously
established and ongoing physician-patient relationship
exists between such physician and the patient being treated.
4. No health care provider shall prescribe any drug,
controlled substance, or other treatment to a patient [based
solely on an internet request or an internet questionnaire]
in the absence of a proper provider-patient relationship, as
described in section 191.1146.

SB 1453 5
5. Medical records of any drug, controlled substance,
or other treatment prescribed through telemedicine, as
defined in section 191.1145, shall be collected, stored, and
maintained in accordance with the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, which allows for
the sharing of protected health information for continuity
of care between health care providers for treatment,
payment, and health care operations.
✓